Washington statutes.
RCW 19.58.020

Definitions.

The definitions contained in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Bid" means a written or oral offer or proposal to buy made by an exhibitor to a distributor in response to an invitation to bid for the license or right to exhibit a motion picture, the license stating the terms under which the exhibitor agrees to exhibit the motion picture.

(2) "Blind bidding" means the exhibitor's bidding or negotiating for, or the exhibitor's offering or agreeing to, terms for the license or right to exhibit a feature motion picture at any time either before the feature motion picture has been trade screened within the state or before the feature motion picture has been otherwise made available for viewing within the state by all exhibitors.

(3) "Blind selling" means the practice whereby a distributor licenses a feature motion picture before the exhibitor is afforded an opportunity to view the feature motion picture by trade screening.

(4) "Buying" or "selling" of the right to exhibit a feature motion picture means the licensing of a theater to show the feature motion picture for a certain number of days for a certain price.

(5) "Distributor" means a person engaged in the business of distributing or supplying more than one feature motion picture per year to exhibitors by rental, sale, licensing, or other agreement.

(6) "Exhibit" or "exhibition" means playing or showing a feature motion picture to the public for an admission charge.

(7) "Exhibitor" means a person in the business of operating one or more theaters in which motion pictures are exhibited to the public.

(8) "Feature motion picture" means a motion picture exceeding sixty minutes in duration.

(9) "Invitation to bid" means a written or oral solicitation or invitation by a distributor to one or more exhibitors to bid or negotiate for the license or right to exhibit a feature motion picture.

(10) "Licensing agreement" means a contract, agreement, understanding, or condition between a distributor and an exhibitor relating to the licensing or exhibition of a feature motion picture by the exhibitor.

(11) "Person" means one or more individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, societies, trusts, organizations, or corporations.

(12) "Run" means the continuous exhibition of a feature motion picture in a defined geographic area for a specified period of time. A "first run" is the first exhibition of the feature motion picture in the defined area; a "second run" is the second exhibition; and "subsequent runs" are subsequent exhibitions after the second run. "Exclusive run" is a run limited to a single theater in a defined geographic area and a "nonexclusive run" is a run in more than one theater in a defined geographic area.

(13) "Theater" means an establishment in which feature motion pictures are regularly exhibited to the public for an admission charge.

(14) "Trade screening" means the exhibition of a feature motion picture, prior to its release for public exhibition by a distributor, in the largest city within the state, which is open to all exhibitors from whom the distributor intends to solicit bids or with whom the distributor intends to negotiate for the license or right to exhibit the feature motion picture.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 29 s 2.]